Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 17 Hotel Keepers

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Hotels, Motels and Restaurants §§ 1, 2, 27 to 46.

Maintenance or regulation by public authorities of tourist or motor camps, courts or motels, 22 ALR2d 774.

Validity and construction of statute requiring or prohibiting posting or other publication of rates by proprietor of hotel, motel or other lodging place, 89 ALR2d 901, 80 ALR3d 740.

Liability of hotel or motel operator for injury or death resulting to guest from defects in furniture in room or suite, 91 ALR3d 483.

Liability of hotel or motel operator for injury or death of guest or privy resulting from condition in plumbing or bathroom of room, 93 ALR3d 253.

Liability for injuries in connection with allegedly dangerous or defective doormat on nonresidential premises, 94 ALR3d 389.

Liability of hotel or motel operator for injury to guest resulting from assault by third party, 28 ALR4th 80.

Liability of hotel and motel for guest's loss of money from room by theft or robbery committed by person other than defendant's servant, 28 ALR4th 120.

Tavernkeeper's liability to patron for third person's assault, 43 ALR4th 281.

Apportionment of liability between landowners and assailants for injuries to crime victims, 54 ALR5th 379.

43 C.J.S. Innkeepers §§ 4 to 7.

§ 33-17-101.
Limitation of liability; permitted if safe provided and notice posted.

Every landlord or keeper of a public inn or hotel in this state, who shall keep in his place of business an iron safe, in good order and suitable for the purpose hereinafter named, and who shall post or cause to be posted in some conspicuous place in his office, and on the inside of every entrance door to every bed chamber, the notice hereinafter mentioned, shall not be liable for the loss of any money, jewelry or other valuables belonging to his guests or customers, unless such loss shall occur by the hand or through the negligence of such landlord, or by a clerk or servant employed by him in such hotel or inn; provided, that nothing herein contained shall apply to such amount of money or other valuables as is usually common and prudent for any such guest to retain in his room or about his person.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 50, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2514; C.S. 1910, § 3422; C.S. 1920, § 4298; R.S. 1931, § 54-101; C.S. 1945, § 37-1301; W.S. 1957, § 33-247.

Editor's notes. —

Prior compilers divided § 1, ch. 50, Laws 1888, into two sections. This section is the first part of said § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of terms “jewelry” and “personal ornaments” as used in statute limiting innkeeper's liability for loss or damage to guest's property, 88 ALR3d 979.

§ 33-17-102.
Limitation of liability; form of notice.

The notice required by this act [§§

33-17-101

,

33-17-102

] shall be substantially as follows: “Notice is hereby given that the proprietor of this house keeps an iron safe suitable for the safe deposit of money, jewelry or other valuable articles belonging to his guests or customers, and unless they leave their money, jewelry, precious stones or other valuables with the landlord, his agent or clerk, in order that he may deposit the same for safe keeping in such iron safe, he will not be liable for the loss thereof.”

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 50, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2515; C.S. 1910, § 3423; C.S. 1920, § 4299; R.S. 1931, § 54-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-1302; W.S. 1957, § 33-248.

§ 33-17-103.
Hotel keepers' lien.

Any keeper of a hotel or boarding house or lodging house or restaurant shall have a lien upon the baggage or other personal property of any person who shall have obtained board or lodging or both, from such keeper, for the amount due for such board or lodging, and such keeper is hereby authorized to retain the possession of such baggage, or personal property until said amount is paid. If the amount due for such board or lodging is not paid within sixty (60) days from the time the same shall have become due and payable, any such keeper may proceed to have such baggage or other personal property sold for the satisfaction of his lien in the following manner: He shall give ten (10) days prior notice of the sale of said articles by him held under his lien, a copy of which he shall immediately transmit, by registered letter, to the owner of the articles at his usual place of abode if known, and he shall post said notices of sale in three (3) conspicuous and public places in the city, town, village or place where said keeper resides, giving a description of the articles to be sold and the time and place of sale, one (1) of which notices shall be posted in the office of the hotel, lodging house, boarding house or restaurant, if still maintained. At the time mentioned in said notices, the said keeper may proceed to sell to the highest and best bidder for cash, all of such personal property held under the lien, or so much thereof as shall be necessary to pay his claim, and the residue of the unsold property, together with the surplus proceeds of such property sold, if any, he shall surrender to the owner, his heirs or legal representatives, on application therefor.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 50, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1481; Laws 1895, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2860; C.S. 1910, § 3770; C.S. 1920, § 4819; R.S. 1931, § 66-401; C.S. 1945, § 37-1303; W.S. 1957, § 33-249.

§ 33-17-104.
Room rates to be posted.

There shall be posted in plain view of any guest or guests occupying such room or rooms on the inside of the door of each lodging room in every hotel or inn a card of a size not less than four (4) by six (6) inches on which shall be plainly printed in the English language in type no smaller than one-quarter of an inch high the rate per day as applying to one (1) or more guests.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 70, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 54-103; C.S. 1945, § 37-1306; W.S. 1957, § 33-252.

§ 33-17-105.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 33-17-104.

Any hotel keeper or inn keeper violating the provisions of this act [§

33-17-104

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) or not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 70, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 54-104; C.S. 1945, § 37-1307; W.S. 1957, § 33-253.